Utah statutes.
11-40-103.   Duties of the Criminal Investigation and Technical Services
Division -- Costs of separate file and background check.
(1)  If a public water utility requests the division to conduct a criminal
background check, the division shall:
(a)  release to the public water utility the full record of criminal
convictions for the person who is the subject of the background check;
(b)  if requested by the public water utility, seek additional information
from regional or national criminal data files in conducting the criminal
background check;
(c)  maintain a separate file of fingerprints submitted under Section
11-40-102; and
(d)  notify the requesting public water utility when a new entry is made
against a person whose fingerprints are held in the file.
(2) (a)  Each public water utility requesting a criminal background check
shall pay the cost of maintaining the separate file under Subsection (1) from
fees charged to those whose fingerprints are submitted to the division.
(b)  Each public water utility requesting the division to conduct a criminal
background check shall pay the cost of the background check, and the money
collected shall be credited to the division to offset its expenses.
